Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.120

Appointment of arbitrators.

(1) No person shall be precluded by reason of the person's nationality from acting as an arbitrator, unless otherwise agreed by the parties.

(2) The parties are free to agree on a procedure of appointing the arbitrator or arbitrators, subject to the provisions of subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(3) Failing such agreement:

(a) In an arbitration with three arbitrators, each party shall appoint one arbitrator, and the two arbitrators thus appointed shall appoint the third arbitrator; if a party fails to appoint the arbitrator within thirty days of receipt of a request to do so from the other party, or if the two arbitrators fail to agree on the third arbitrator within thirty days of their appointment, the appointment shall be made, upon request of a party, by the court specified in RCW 7.05.070; and

(b) In an arbitration with a sole arbitrator, if the parties are unable to agree on the arbitrator, the arbitrator shall be appointed, upon request of a party, by the court specified in RCW 7.05.070.

(4) Where, under an appointment procedure agreed upon by the parties:

(a) A party fails to act as required under such procedure;

(b) The parties, or two arbitrators, are unable to reach an agreement expected of them under such procedure; or

(c) A third party, including an institution, fails to perform any function entrusted to it under such procedure;

Any party may request the court specified in RCW 7.05.070 to take the necessary measure, unless the agreement on the appointment procedure provides other means for securing the appointment.

(5) A decision on a matter entrusted by subsection (3) or (4) of this section to the court specified in RCW 7.05.070 shall be subject to no appeal. The court, in appointing an arbitrator, shall have due regard to any qualifications required of the arbitrator by the agreement of the parties and to such considerations as are likely to secure the appointment of an independent and impartial arbitrator and, in the case of a sole or third arbitrator, shall take into account as well the advisability of appointing an arbitrator of a nationality other than those of the parties.

[ 2015 c 276 s 12.]